scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_C.yaml
     anaamim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anaamimaad
     anaamim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enaamimaad
     anaamim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anaamim
     andawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandawaabamaa
     andawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: ninandawaabamig
     andawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: ginandawaabamin
     andawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: ginandawaabam
     andawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandawaabamaan
     andawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3Sg: andawaabamaa
     andawaabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andawaabamaad
     andawaabam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+?: endawaabamaad
     andawaabam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andawaabam
     andawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandawenimaa
     andawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: ninandawenimig
     andawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: ninandawenimigoo
     andawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: ginandawenimin
     andawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: ginandawenim
     andawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandawenimaan
     andawenim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andawenimaad
     andawenim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endawenimaad
     andawenim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andawenim
     andoba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandoba'aa
     andoba'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandoba'aan
     andoba'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andoba'aad
     andoba'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endoba'aad
     andoba'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andoba'
     andokawe'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandokawe'aa
     andokawe'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandokawe'aan
     andokawe'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andokawe'aad
     andokawe'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endokawe'aad
     andokawe'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andokawe'
     andom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandomaa
     andom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: ninandomig
     andom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandomaan
     andom+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andomaad
     andom+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endomaad
     andom+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andom
     andomaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandomaamaa
     andomaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandomaamaan
     andomaam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andomaamaad
     andomaam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endomaamaad
     andomaam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: andomaam
     andoobiigam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandoobiigamaa
     andoobiigam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandoobiigamaan
     andoobiigam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andoobiigamaad
     andoobiigam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endoobiigamaad
     andoobiigam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andoobiigam
     andoojiin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandoojiinaa
     andoojiin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandoojiinaan
     andoojiin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andoojiinaad
     andoojiin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endoojiinaad
     andoojiin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andoojiin
     andwewem+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandwewemaa
     andwewem+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandwewemaan
     andwewem+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andwewemaad
     andwewem+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endwewemaad
     andwewem+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andwewem
     ango'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indango'aa
     ango'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindango'aa
     ango'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidango'aa
     ango'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odango'aan
     ango'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ango'aad
     ango'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: engo'aad
     ango'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ango'
     aniben+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanibenaa
     aniben+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanibenaan
     aniben+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anibenaad
     aniben+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enibenaad
     aniben+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aniben
     anibeshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanibeshimaa
     anibeshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: odanibeshimaan
     anibeshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anibeshimaad
     anibeshim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enibeshimaad
     anibeshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anibeshim
     anibewebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanibewebinaa
     anibewebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanibewebinaan
     anibewebin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anibewebinaad
     anibewebin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enibewebinaad
     anibewebin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anibewebin
     animibizoni'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimibizoni'aa
     animibizoni'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanimibizoni'aa
     animibizoni'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanimibizoni'aa
     animibizoni'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimibizoni'aan
     animibizoni'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animibizoni'aad
     animibizoni'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimibizoni'aad
     animibizoni'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animibizoni' 
     animidaabii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimidaabii'aa
     animidaabii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimidaabii'aan
     animidaabii'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animidaabii'aad
     animidaabii'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimidaabii'aad
     animidaabii'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animidaabii'
     animikon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimikonaa
     animikon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanimikonaa
     animikon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanimikonaa
     animikon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimikonaan
     animikon+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animikonaad
     animikon+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimikonaad
     animikon+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animikon 
     animikoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndanimikoshimaa
     animikoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanimikoshimaa
     animikoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanimikoshimaa
     animikoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimikoshimaan
     animikoshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animikoshimaad
     animikoshim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimikoshimaad
     animikoshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animikoshim 
     animoom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimoomaa
     animoom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanimoomaa
     animoom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanimoomaa
     animoom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimoomaan
     animoom+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animoomaad
     animoom+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimoomaad
     animoom+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animoom 
     anokii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanokii'aa
     anokii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanokii'aa
     anokii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanokii'aa
     anokii'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanokii'aan
     anokii'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anokii'aad
     anokii'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enokii'aad
     anokii'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anokii'
     apagadaganaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapagadaganaamaa
     apagadaganaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapagadaganaamaan
     apagadaganaam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apagadaganaamaad
     apagadaganaam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epagadaganaamaad
     apagadaganaam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apagadaganaam
     apam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapamaa
     apam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapamaan
     apam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apamaad
     apam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epamaad
     apam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apam 
     apikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapikaanaa
     apikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapikaanaa
     apikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidapikaanaa
     apikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindapikaanig
     apikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidapikaazh
     apikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidapikaanin
     apikaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apikaanaad
     apishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapishimaa
     apishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: odapishimaan
     apishim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apishimaad
     apishim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epishimaad
     apishim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apishim
     apiichishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapiichishimaa
     apiichishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odapiichishimaan
     apiichishim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apiichishimaad
     apiichishim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epiichishimaad
     apiichishim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apiichishim
     apiitagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapiitagimaa
     apiitagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapiitagimaa
     apiitagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidapiitagimaa
     apiitagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapiitagimaan
     apiitagim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apiitagimaad
     apiitagim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epiitagimaad
     apiitagim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apiitagim 
     apiitenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapiitenimaa
     apiitenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapiitenimaa
     apiitenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidapiitenimaa
     apiitenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapiitenimaan
     apiitenim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apiitenimaad
     apiitenim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epiitenimaad
     apiitenim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apiitenim
     asigagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indasigagimaa
     asigagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindasigagimaa
     asigagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidasigagimaa
     asigagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odasigagimaan
     asigagim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asigagimaad
     asigagim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: esigagimaad
     asigagim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: asigagim
     asigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indasiginaa
     asigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindasiginaa
     asigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidasiginaa
     asigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odasiginaan
     asigin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asiginaad
     asigin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: esiginaad
     asigin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: asigin 
     asigishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+?: indasigishimaag
     asigishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odasigishimaan
     asigishim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asigishimaad
     asigishim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: esigishimaad
     asigishim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: asigishim
     asham+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indashamaa
     asham+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindashamaa
     asham+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidashamaa
     asham+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindashamig
     asham+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: nindashamigoo
     asham+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidashamin
     asham+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidasham
     asham+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashamaan
     asham+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3Sg: ashamaa
     asham+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashamaad
     asham+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshamaad
     asham+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: asham 
     asham+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: gego ashamaaken
     asham+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashamaakan
     ashawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindashawaabamaa
     ashawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashawaabamaan
     ashawaabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashawaabamaad
     ashawaabam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshawaabamaad
     ashawaabam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashawaabam
     ashi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indasaa
     ashi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindasaa
     ashi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidasaa
     ashi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odasaan
     ashi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asaad
     ashi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: esaad
     ashi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashi
     ashidaakon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indashidaakonaa
     ashidaakon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashidaakonaan
     ashidaakon+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashidaakonaad
     ashidaakon+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshidaakonaad
     ashidaakon+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashidaakon
     ashidaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indashidaakoshimaa
     ashidaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashidaakoshimaan
     ashidaakoshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashidaakoshimaad
     ashidaakoshim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshidaakoshimaad
     ashidaakoshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashidaakoshim
     ashidaakowebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindashidaakowebinaa
     ashidaakowebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashidaakowebinaan
     ashidaakowebin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashidaakowebinaad
     ashidaakowebin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshidaakowebinaad
     ashidaakowebin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashidaakowebin
     ashidin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indashidinaa
     ashidin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindashidinaa
     ashidin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidashidinaa
     ashidin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashidinaan
     ashidin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashidinaad
     ashidin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshidinaad
